Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_Germinated_Constant.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascGerminatedConstem;

LEXICON NounMascGerminatedCon

්න+N+RT:්න #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:්නා #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:්නා #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:්නාත්  #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:්නාත්  #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:්නායි  #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:්නායි  #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:්නෙක් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:්නෙකි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:්නෙකුත් #;
්න+N+RT+PL+NOM:්නෝ  #;
්න+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:්නෝත්  #;
්න+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:්නෝයි  #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:්නෙකු #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:්නකු #
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:්නෙකුත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:්නෙකි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:්නකුත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:්නකුයි #;
්න+N+RT+PL+ACC:්නන්  #;
්න+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:්නනුත්  #;
්න+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:්නනි  #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:්නාට #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:්නාටත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:්නාටයි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:්නෙකුට #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:ෙකුටත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:්නෙකුටයි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:්නකුට #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:්නකුටත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:්නකුටයි #;
්න+N+RT+PL+DAT:්නන්ට #;
්න+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:්නන්ටත් #;
්න+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:්නන්ටයි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:ාගෙන් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:්නාගෙනුත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:්නාගෙනි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:්නෙකුගෙන් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:්නෙකුගෙනුත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:්නෙකුගෙනි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:්නකුගෙන් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:්නකුගෙනුත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:්නකුගෙනි #;
්න+N+RT+PL+ABL:්නන්ගෙන් #;
්න+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:්නන්ගෙනුත් #;
්න+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:්නන්ගෙනි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:්නාගේ #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:්නාගේත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:්නාගේයි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:්නාගෙ #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:්නාගෙත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:්නාගෙයි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:්නෙකුගේ #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:්නෙකුගේත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:්නෙකුගේයි #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:්නකුගේ #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:්නකුගේත් #;
්න+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:්නකුගේයි #;
්න+N+RT+PL+GEN:්නන්ගේ #;
්න+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:්නන්ගේත් #;
්න+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:්නන්ගේයි #;
්න+N+RT+PL+VOC:්නනි #;

LEXICON NounMascGerminatedConstem   
අණදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අතහරින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අත්හිටුවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අදහන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අන්දන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අඳුනන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අමතන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අඹන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අරපිරිමසන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අලළන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අවුස්සන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අස්වද්දන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
අහන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ආරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇඟෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇමිණෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇලෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇසිරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇහිඳින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඈඳෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉගැන්වෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉදිමෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉන්න		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉඹින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉලිප්පෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉසිලෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉහෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
උගුළන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
උදුරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
උපදින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
උයවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
උස්සන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
උළන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
එරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
එල්ලෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
එළන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
එළවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
එළෙවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඔබන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඔසවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කඩවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කප්පන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කරවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කලඹන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කහන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කැඩෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කැපෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කැවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කියන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කිවිසන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කූද්දන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කෙලෙසෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
කොනිත්තන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගණින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගලවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගහන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගාන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගැයෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගැවසෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගැළපෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගිලෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගෙනෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගෙවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගොඩනැගෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තකන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තපින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තැතනෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තැම්බෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තිගැස්සෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තෙපලන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තෙරපෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
තෝරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දඟලන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දමන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දැනෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දැවටෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දිනන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දිරිගැන්වෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දිවුරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දුවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දෙසන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
දොවින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නඟන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නමදින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නවත්තන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නහන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නාන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නැගිටින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නැටවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නැවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නෑවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නිදියන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නිමෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නිවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
නෙරපන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පටලන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පතුරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පනවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පරයන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පලහන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පවසන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පහදන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පාගන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පාරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පාහින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පැතිරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පැනවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පැවරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පැසසෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පැළෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පෑහෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිපිරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිඹින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පියඹන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිරික්සන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිරිමදින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිරිමැහෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිලිස්සෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිහන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිළිගන්න		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පිළිපදින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පීනන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පුප්පන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පුම්බන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පුලුස්සන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පෙඟෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පෙරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පෙරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පෙළන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පොපියන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පොලඹවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බණින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බඳවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බලන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බස්සන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බහාලන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බැදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බැලෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බියවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බුරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
බේරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මඩවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මතුරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මලවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මානන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මැඩලන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මැඬෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මැවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මියැදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මුදවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
මොළවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
යවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
යෙදවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
යොමන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
රඟන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
රවටන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
රැකෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
රැවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
රිදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
රූරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ලැබෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ලියැවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ලුහුබඳින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
ලොවින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වටලන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වඩන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වදන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වනන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වපුරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වරදින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වළක්වන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වැගිරෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වැනසෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වැසෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වෑහෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
විදින		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වියළෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
විහිදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
වේළන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සනසන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සමරන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සලසන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සැදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සැලෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සිතන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සුපිපෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
සෝදන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හදන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හරවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හාදවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හැදෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හැසිරවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හිඟන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හිඳුවන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හෙබවෙන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
හොයන		NounMascGerminatedCon;
පන්දුයවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පාවාදෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
උද්ගතවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පසිඳලන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
විරුද්ධවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
අතපොවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
අහුලන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඉවසාගන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
කටයුතුකරන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
කිරිදොවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගාටන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
තඩිබාන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
දික්කරන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
දුවයන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
නහින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
නිවන්දක	NounMascGerminatedCon;
නොබොන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පරද්දන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පැකිලෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පීඩාවිඳින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පොඩිවෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
බැසයන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
භුක්තිවිඳින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
රත්වෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ලිහන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
වැරදෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
විවාහවෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
වේගපන්දුයවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
සාකච්ඡාකරන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
හකුළන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
හෙලාදකින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පෙන්වන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ඇතුල්වෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
වට්ටන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ක්‍රියාකරවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ජීවත්වන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
හැසිරෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
රකින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පහරදෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ලබාදුන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
අත්විඳින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
බලාගන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
සොයාගන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගෙනදෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
බබළවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
අදහන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
බෙදන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගරන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
උපදින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
ගොඩනැගෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පමුණුවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
බිහිකරන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
වලක්වන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
හොබවන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
නොයන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
නොදෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
දකින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
සුරකින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
දමන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
අඳින	NounMascGerminatedCon;
කඩන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
බොන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
පෙලෙන	NounMascGerminatedCon;
දිස	NounMascGerminatedCon;
